Hawaii statutes.
[§147-102] Certification and audit
services. The department of agriculture shall fix, assess, and collect
fees for certification or audit services provided by temporary inspectors
employed under this part. The fees shall be in amounts necessary to cover all
costs of the administration and provision of the certification or audit
services provided under this part; provided that the department of agriculture
shall establish charges for traveling expenses and extraordinary services when
the performance of the services involves unusual cost. The fees and charges
established by the department of agriculture shall not be subject to chapter
91. The department of agriculture may employ temporary inspectors to assist in
providing certification or audit services under parts I, III, IV, VIII, and IX,
and those temporary inspectors shall be exempt from chapter 76. [L 2003, c 49,
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next